Utah statutes.
70-3a-102.   Relation to federal law.
(1)  This chapter shall be interpreted to provide for the registration and
protection of trademarks and service marks in a manner substantially
consistent with the federal system of trademark registration and protection
under the Trademark Act of 1946, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1051, et seq.
(2)  In interpreting this chapter, a construction given the Trademark Act of
1946, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1051, et seq., should be used as persuasive authority.
